apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="դ/ուստր__n_aa"> <!-- er-type, archaic and irregular-->
      <e>       <p><l>ստրից</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրից</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստեր</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստերը</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստերն</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրով</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրով</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստր</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրը</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրն</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերից</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերից</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերի</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերի</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերին</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերին</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերով</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերով</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրեր</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրեր</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերը</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ստրերն</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերը</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ուստրերն</l><r>ուստր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="աղջ/իկ__n_aa"> <!-- Irregular -->
      <e>       <p><l>իկ</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկը</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկն</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>կա</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>կան</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>կանից</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>կանով</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>իկներ</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկները</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկների</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկներին</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկներով</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>իկներից</l><r>իկ<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="ուսանող__n_aa">  <!-- No locative -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ներ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ները</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ներն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ների</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ներին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ներից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ներով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="հայ__n_aa">  <!-- i-type, plural in -er, animate; No locative -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>եր</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երը</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երն</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>երի</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երին</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>երից</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>երով</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ուսանող"><i>ուսանող</i><par n="ուսանող__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="աղջիկ"><i>աղջ</i><par n="աղջ/իկ__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="դուստր"><i>դ</i><par n="դ/ուստր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="հայ"><i>հայ</i><par n="հայ__n_aa"/></e>
